Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4419
Issuance of bonds; immunity.

The members of a city's governing body and any person executing bonds issued under the Good Life District Economic Development Act shall not be liable personally on such bonds by reason of the issuance thereof.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 12.